District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.10

Quorum of members.

Unless the organic rules otherwise require a greater number of members or percentage of the voting power, the voting member or members present at a members meeting shall constitute a quorum.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 510 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.